Indiana, session 2026, HB1094.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 34-26-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 5.5. Uniform Recognition and Enforcement of
Canadian Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "Canadian domestic violence
protection order" means a judgment or part of a judgment or
order issued in a civil proceeding by a court of Canada under law
of the issuing jurisdiction which relates to domestic violence and
prohibits a respondent from:
(1) being in physical proximity to a protected individual;
(2) following a protected individual;
(3) directly or indirectly contacting or communicating with a
protected individual or other individuals described in the
order;
(4) being within a certain distance of a specified place or
location associated with a protected individual; or
2026 IN 1094—LS 6449/DI 151


(5) molesting, annoying, harassing, or engaging in threatening
conduct directed at a protected individual.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "issuing court" means the court
that issues a Canadian domestic violence protection order.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "law enforcement officer" has
the meaning set forth in IC 35-31.5-2-185.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "protected individual" means an
individual protected by a Canadian domestic violence protection
order.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "protection order" or "order for
protection" means an injunction or other order issued by a court
to prevent an individual from:
(1) engaging in violent or threatening acts against;
(2) engaging in harassment of;
(3) engaging in direct or indirect contact or communication
with; or
(4) being in physical proximity to;
another person.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "record" means information that
is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic
or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "respondent" means an
individual against whom a Canadian domestic violence protection
order is issued.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "state" means any of the
following:
(1) A state of the United States.
(2) The District of Columbia.
(3) Puerto Rico.
(4) The United States Virgin Islands.
(5) A federally recognized Indian tribe.
(6) Any territory or insular possession subject to the
jurisdiction of the United States.
Sec. 9. This chapter applies to a Canadian domestic violence
protection order issued before, on, or after July 1, 2026, and to a
continuing action for enforcement of a Canadian domestic violence
protection order commenced before, on, or after July 1, 2026. A
request for enforcement of a Canadian domestic violence
protection order made on or after July 1, 2026, for a violation of
the order occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2026, is governed by
this chapter.
Sec. 10. (a) If a law enforcement officer determines under
2026 IN 1094—LS 6449/DI 151


subsection (b) or (c) that there is probable cause to believe a valid
Canadian domestic violence protection order exists and the order
has been violated, the officer shall enforce the terms of the
Canadian domestic violence protection order as if it were a
protection order issued by Indiana. Presentation to a law
enforcement officer of a certified copy of a Canadian domestic
violence protection order is not required for enforcement.
(b) Presentation to a law enforcement officer of a record of a
Canadian domestic violence protection order that identifies both
a protected individual and a respondent, and on its face is in effect,
constitutes probable cause to believe that a valid order exists.
(c) If a record of a Canadian domestic violence protection order
is not presented as provided in subsection (b), a law enforcement
officer may consider other information in determining whether
there is probable cause to believe that a valid Canadian domestic
violence protection order exists.
(d) If a law enforcement officer determines that an otherwise
valid Canadian domestic violence protection order cannot be
enforced because the respondent has not been notified of or served
with the order, the officer shall notify the protected individual that
the officer will make reasonable efforts to contact the respondent,
consistent with the safety of the protected individual. After notice
to the protected individual and consistent with the safety of the
individual, the officer shall make a reasonable effort to inform the
respondent of the order, notify the respondent of the terms of the
order, provide a record of the order, if available, to the respondent,
and allow the respondent a reasonable opportunity to comply with
the order before the officer enforces the order.
(e) If a law enforcement officer determines that an individual is
a protected individual, the officer shall inform the individual of
available local victim services.
Sec. 11. (a) A court may issue an order enforcing or refusing to
enforce a Canadian domestic violence protection order on
application of:
(1) a person authorized by law to seek enforcement of an
order for protection; or
(2) a respondent.
(b) In a proceeding under subsection (a), the court shall follow
the procedures in IC 34-26-5 for enforcement of an order for
protection. An order entered under this section is limited to the
enforcement of the terms of the Canadian domestic violence
protection order.
2026 IN 1094—LS 6449/DI 151


(c) A Canadian domestic violence protection order is
enforceable under this section if:
(1) the order identifies a protected individual and a
respondent;
(2) the order is valid and in effect;
(3) the issuing court had jurisdiction over the parties and the
subject matter under law applicable in the issuing court; and
(4) the order was issued after:
(A) the respondent was given reasonable notice and had an
opportunity to be heard before the court issued the order;
or
(B) in the case of an ex parte order, the respondent was
given reasonable notice and had or will have an
opportunity to be heard within a reasonable time after the
order was issued, in a manner consistent with the right of
the respondent to due process.
(d) A Canadian domestic violence protection order valid on its
face is prima facie evidence of its enforceability under this section.
(e) A claim that a Canadian domestic violence protection order
does not comply with subsection (c) is an affirmative defense in a
proceeding seeking enforcement of the order. If the court
determines that the order is not enforceable, the court shall issue
an order that the Canadian domestic violence protection order is
not enforceable under this section and section 10 of this chapter
and may not be registered under section 12 of this chapter.
Sec. 12. (a) Registration or filing of a Canadian domestic
violence protection order is not required for its enforcement in
Indiana, and a protection order that is consistent with this chapter
shall be accorded full faith and credit notwithstanding a failure to
register or file the order in Indiana.
(b) If an individual wishes to register a Canadian domestic
violence protection order in Indiana, all Indiana courts of record
shall accommodate the request. The office of judicial
administration shall develop a form to be used by courts, clerks,
and law enforcement agencies when an individual makes a request
to register a Canadian domestic violence protection order. Except
for a protective order issued to the Indiana protective order
registry established by IC 5-2-9-5.5, the courts, clerks of the courts,
and sheriffs or law enforcement agencies maintaining depositories
shall employ the same procedures required under IC 5-2-9-6 for
entering, modifying, extending, or terminating a Canadian
domestic violence protection order as those used for a protection
2026 IN 1094—LS 6449/DI 151


order and a no contact order originating in Indiana.
Sec. 13. A state agency, local governmental agency, law
enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, clerk of court, and state
or local governmental official acting in an official capacity are
immune from civil and criminal liability for an act or omission
arising out of the registration or enforcement of a Canadian
domestic violence protection order or the detention or arrest of an
alleged violator of a Canadian domestic violence protection order
if the act or omission was a good faith effort to comply with this
chapter.
Sec. 14. An individual who seeks a remedy under this chapter
may seek other legal or equitable remedies.
Sec. 15. In applying and construing this uniform act,
consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of
the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact
it.
Sec. 16. This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the
Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15
U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section
101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic
delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that
act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).
2026 IN 1094—LS 6449/DI 151